Tennessee, session 114, HB2615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-6-102(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(1) A voter who desires to vote early shall go to the county election commission
office or another polling place appropriately designated by the county election
commission within the posted hours not more than twelve (12) days nor less than five (5)
days before the day of the election. A voter desiring to vote in the early voting period
shall sign an application for a ballot.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-6-102(c), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), when a presidential preference primary is
held or an election is held at the same time as a presidential preference primary, a voter
who desires to vote early for such elections shall go to the county election commission
office within the posted hours not more than fourteen (14) days nor less than seven (7)
days before the day of the election. This subsection (c) shall not apply to voting
pursuant to § 2-6-601.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2615
011318
- 1 -